Illinois, session 104th, HB5018.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-201 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/1-201)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 1-201)7    Sec. 1-201. Street. Any highway that is part of the 8municipal street system described in Section 2-104 of the 9Illinois Highway Code. The entire width between boundary lines 10of every way publicly maintained, when any part thereof is 11open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel.12(Source: P.A. 90-655, eff. 7-30-98.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.